Nebraska, session 109, LB1075A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $12,000 from the Nebraska
Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2)
$25,000 from the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash Fund
for FY2026-27 to the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission, for
Program 94, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1075, One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-